FST Assignment 2/sources/cat3.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
	+Noun +Mas +Nominative +Accusative +NominativeOrAccusative +Singular +Plural +Definite +Indefinite

LEXICON Root
	walas	Noun1;
	puq		Noun1;
	yak		Noun1;
	lEn		Noun1;
	kiMul	Noun1;

LEXICON Noun1
	+Noun+Mas:0	Noun2;
	
LEXICON Noun2
	+NominativeOrAccusative+Singular+Definite:A	#;
	+Nominative+Singular+Indefinite:ek		#;
	+Nominative+Plural:u				#;
	+Accusative+Plural:un			#;
